Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4619.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 33 of Chapter 90, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by inserting after subsection 38 the following subsection:-
‘(39) No fee for the reinstatement of a license following a period of suspension shall
exceed fifty dollars, if the sole reason for such a suspension was for a noncriminal traffic
violation.’
of 1